South Dakota, session 2026, HB1187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 26-8A-3 be AMENDED:
26-8A-3. Any physician, dentist, doctor of osteopathy, chiropractor, optometrist,
emergency medical technician, paramedic, mental health professional or counselor,
podiatrist, psychologist, religious healing practitioner, social worker, hospital intern or
resident, parole or court services officer, law enforcement officer, coach of a school
activity, teacher, school counselor, school official, nurse, licensed or registered child
welfare provider, employee or volunteer of a domestic abuse shelter, employee or
volunteer of a child advocacy organization or child welfare service provider, chemical
dependency counselor, coroner, dental hygienist, or any safety-sensitive position as
defined in § 3-6C-1, who has reasonable cause to suspect that a child under the age of
eighteen has been abused or neglected, as defined in § 26-8A-2, shall report that
information in accordance with §§ 26-8A-6, 26-8A-7, and 26-8A-8. Any person who
intentionally fails to make the required report is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. Any
person who knows or has reason to suspect that a child has been abused or neglected as
defined in § 26-8A-2 may report that information as provided in § 26-8A-8.

26.873.12 2 1187
An Act to add coaches to the list of mandatory reporters of child abuse or neglect.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
House as Bill No. 1187
By
Chief Clerk of the House for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
Speaker of the House ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Chief Clerk of the House
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
President of the Senate
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Secretary of the Senate Secretary of State
House Bill No. 1187 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
HB1187 ENROLLED